Utah, session 2026, SB314.
Section 1. Section 26B-1-244 is enacted to read:26B-1-244. Sleep disorder education and outreach.(1)As used in this section, "division" means the Division of Population Health within the department.(2)The division shall develop educational materials and conduct public education outreach activities related to sleep health and sleep disorders, including:(a)narcolepsy type 1 and type 2;(b)idiopathic hypersomnia;(c)obstructive sleep apnea;(d)central sleep apnea; and(e)circadian rhythm sleep-wake disorders.(3)The division shall design the educational materials and public education outreach activities to:(a)increase public awareness of sleep disorders and sleep disorders' impact on physical, mental, and public health;(b)promote early recognition, diagnosis, and evidence-based treatment and medication for sleep disorders;(c)reduce stigma associated with sleep disorders, particularly sleep disorders that affect neurological and mental health;(d)educate health care providers, educators, and the general public on best practices for screening, diagnosis, and management of sleep disorders; and(e)address public safety implications of untreated sleep disorders, including occupational hazards and the risks associated with driving.(4)The division may partner with other governmental entities and private organizations including insurers, health care provider professional organizations, school districts, community health programs, the Department of Workforce Services, and the Department of Transportation to disseminate educational materials and conduct public education outreach activities.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.